Indiana, session 2026, SB168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The accounts shall be closed
annually on the thirty-first day of December, and a balance sheet of that
date promptly taken therefrom. On or before the thirtieth day of April
following, such balance sheet, together with such other information as
the commission shall prescribe, verified by an officer of the public
utility, shall be filed with the commission.
(b) An electricity supplier, as defined by IC 8-1-2.3-2(b), shall
include in the electricity supplier's filing under subsection (a) a
separate summary of the following information for each of the
electricity supplier's electric generation plants:
(1) The original book value of the generation plant.
(2) The current book value of the generation plant.
(3) The total amount of investments made in the generation
plant for the purpose of compliance with federal
requirements.
(4) The estimated replacement cost of the generation plant on
2026 IN 168—LS 6710/DI 119


an accredited basis using the generation plant's summer
UCAP (as defined by IC 8-1-8.5-13(k)).
(c) The commission may issue a general administrative order to
prescribe:
(1) any information supplementary to the information under
subsection (b); and
(2) any additional information that the commission considers
necessary;
that an electricity supplier must submit in the electricity supplier's
filing under subsection (a).
2026 IN 168—LS 6710/DI 119